Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.10.040

No subsequent vote for six years.

When a proposition for abandonment of the classification of charter code city has been submitted to the voters of the charter code city in an election and has been rejected by a majority of such voters, such proposition shall not again be submitted to the voters for six years thereafter.

[ 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.10.040.]